Hawaii, session 2026, SB187.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that on August 28, 1971, the Ewa Beach public and school library opened on the James Campbell high school campus with the dual purpose of serving as both a school library and a community library.  The Ewa Beach public and school library is administratively established within the Hawaii public library system and the hours are established by the state librarian, subject to state library funding. The legislature further finds that the operational hours of the Ewa Beach public and school library make it difficult for the students of James Campbell high school and the nearby Pohakea elementary school and Ilima Intermediate school to use the library.  The library is currently open on Mondays and Tuesdays from 12:00 p.m. to 4:00 p.m. and 5:00 p.m. to 7:00 p.m., Wednesdays and Thursdays from 9:00 a.m. to 1:00 p.m. and 2:00 p.m. to 4:00 p.m., Fridays from 12:00 p.m. to 4:00 p.m., and is closed on Saturdays and Sundays. The purpose of this Act is to require the department of education to transfer the Ewa Beach public and school library from the state public library system to James Campbell high school. SECTION 2. The department of education shall transfer the Ewa Beach public and school library, located at 91-950 North Road, Ewa Beach, Hawaii 96706, from the state public library system to James Campbell high school. SECTION 3.  All rights, powers, functions, and duties of the state public library system with regard to Ewa Beach public and school library are transferred within the department of education. All employees who occupy civil service positions and whose functions are transferred within the department of education by this Act shall retain their civil service status, whether permanent or temporary.  Employees shall be transferred without loss of salary, seniority (except as prescribed by applicable collective bargaining agreements), retention points, prior service credit, any vacation and sick leave credits previously earned, and other rights, benefits, and privileges, in accordance with state personnel laws and this Act; provided that the employees possess the minimum qualifications and public employment requirements for the class or position to which transferred or appointed, as applicable; provided further that subsequent changes in status may be made pursuant to applicable civil service and compensation laws. Any employee who, prior to this Act, is exempt from civil service and is transferred as a consequence of this Act may retain the employee's exempt status, but shall not be appointed to a civil service position as a consequence of this Act.  An exempt employee who is transferred by this Act shall not suffer any loss of prior service credit, vacation or sick leave credits previously earned, or other employee benefits or privileges as a consequence of this Act; provided that the employees possess legal and public employment requirements for the position to which transferred or appointed, as applicable; provided further that subsequent changes in status may be made pursuant to applicable employment and compensation laws.  The superintendent of education may prescribe the duties and qualifications of these employees and fix their salaries without regard to chapter 76, Hawaii Revised Statutes. SECTION 4.  All appropriations, records, equipment, machines, files, supplies, contracts, books, papers, documents, maps, and other personal property heretofore made, used, acquired, or held by the state public library system regarding the Ewa Beach public and school library and transferred within the department of education shall be transferred with the functions to which they relate. SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________